Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,233
Court award costs of litigation; attorney's fees.

(1) In issuing any final order in any action brought under the Nebraska Emergency Planning and Community Right to Know Act, the court may award costs of litigation, including reasonable attorney's fees and expert witness fees, to the prevailing or the substantially prevailing party if the court determines such an award is appropriate.

(2) Nothing in section 81-15,230 shall restrict or expand any right which any person or class of persons may have under any federal or state statute or common law to seek enforcement of any requirement of the act.

Laws 1997, LB 374, § 43.